New York, session 2025-2026, S2575.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 24 of the tax law is REPEALED. 2 § 2. Section 31 of the tax law, as added by section 12 of part Q of 3 chapter 57 of the laws of 2010, is REPEALED. 4 § 3. Clause (E) of subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 5 of section 210-B of the tax law is REPEALED. 6 § 4. Subdivision 20 of section 210-B of the tax law is REPEALED. 7 § 5. Subdivision 32 of section 210-B of the tax law is REPEALED. 8 § 6. Clause (v) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph 2 of subsection (a) 9 of section 606 of the tax law is REPEALED. 10 § 7. Clause (xxii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph 1 of subsection 11 (i) of section 606 of the tax law is REPEALED. 12 § 8. Clause (xxxi) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph 1 of subsection 13 (i) of section 606 of the tax law, as added by section 14 of part Q of 14 chapter 57 of the laws of 2010, is REPEALED. 15 § 9. Subsection (gg) of section 606 of the tax law is REPEALED. 16 § 10. Subsection (qq) of section 606 of the tax law, as added by 17 section 15 of part Q of chapter 57 of the laws of 2010, is REPEALED. 18 § 11. Subdivision (b) of section 1201-a of the tax law is REPEALED. 19 § 12. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03674-01-5